Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5657
Commission members; expenses.

Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 from funds appropriated for the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 68.